Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-106
Director; rules and regulations; standards.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the governance of banks under his or her supervision as may in his or her judgment seem wise and expedient and which do not in any way conflict with any of the provisions of law. In adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations, the director shall consider generally recognized sound banking principles, the financial soundness of banks, competitive conditions, and general economic conditions.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 34, p. 457;

C.S.1929, § 8-104;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 7, p. 137;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-104;

R.S.1943, § 8-107;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 6, p. 136;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 7.

For adoption and promulgation of administrative rules, see Administrative Procedure Act, section 84-920.